Utah statutes.
7-18a-402.   Disclosure of lack of deposit insurance.

Each foreign depository institution authorized to transact business in this state through an agency or branch shall give notice to the customers of the foreign depository institution, as prescribed by rule or order, that deposits and credit balances in the agency or branch are not insured by a federal deposit insurance agency.

